West Virginia, session 2025, SB411.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. Authorization for Department of commerce to promulgate legislative rules. §64-10-1. Office Miners' Health, Safety, and Training. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on November 7, 2024, authorized under the authority of §22A-10-3 of this code, relating to the Office Miners' Health, Safety, and Training (the certification, recertification, and training of EMT-Miners and the certification of EMT-M instructors, 56 CSR 22), is authorized.